test/src/morphology/A-keeuh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - ǩeeuˊh class A40e: # Adjective 'poor/köyhä' - full paradigm
    ǩeeuˊh+A+Pred+Sg: ǩeeuˊh
    ǩeeuˊh+A+Pred+Pl: ǩeeuˊh
    ǩeeuˊh+A+Attr: ǩeeuˊhes
    ǩeeuˊh+A+Comp: ǩeeuˊhab
    ǩeeuˊh+A+Superl: ǩeeuˊhmõs
